Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202281-2253
Staff training requirements; ombudsman advocate certification; required.

(1) The state long-term care ombudsman shall ensure that the staff of the office and of local long-term care ombudsman programs are trained in:

(a) Federal, state, and local laws, regulations, and policies with respect to long-term care facilities in the state;

(b) Investigative techniques;

(c) Management of long-term care facilities; and

(d) Such other matters as the office deems appropriate.

(2) The state long-term care ombudsman shall develop procedures for the certification of ombudsman advocates.

(3) No ombudsman advocate shall investigate any complaint filed with the office unless such person is certified by the office.

Laws 1992, LB 677, § 17;

Laws 2018, LB903, § 17.